Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-885.17
Nonresident broker's license; nonresident
salesperson's license; issuance; requirements; fingerprinting; criminal history
record information check; reciprocal agreements.

(1)(a) A
nonresident of this state who is actively engaged in the real estate business,
who maintains a place of business in his or her resident regulatory jurisdiction,
and who has been duly licensed in that regulatory jurisdiction to conduct
such business in that regulatory jurisdiction may, in the discretion of the
commission, be issued a nonresident broker's license.

(b) A nonresident salesperson employed by a broker holding a nonresident
broker's license may, in the discretion of the commission, be issued a nonresident
salesperson's license under such nonresident broker.

(c) A nonresident who becomes a resident of the State of Nebraska and
who holds a broker's or salesperson's license in his or her prior resident
regulatory jurisdiction shall be issued a resident broker's or salesperson's
license upon filing an application, paying the applicable license fee, complying
with the criminal history record information check under subsection (4) of
this section, filing the affidavit required by subsection (7) of this section,
and providing to the commission adequate proof of completion of a three-hour
class approved by the commission specific to the Nebraska Real Estate License
Act and sections 76-2401 to 76-2430.

(2) Obtaining a nonresident broker's license shall constitute sufficient
contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the
licensee in any action arising out of the licensee's activity in this state.

(3) Prior to the issuance of any license to any nonresident, he or she
shall file with the commission a duly certified copy of the license issued
to the applicant by the resident regulatory jurisdiction, pay to the commission
the nonresident license fee as provided in section 81-885.14 for the obtaining
of a broker's or salesperson's license, and provide to the commission adequate
proof of completion of a three-hour class approved by the commission specific
to the Nebraska Real Estate License Act and sections 76-2401 to 76-2430.

(4) An applicant for an original nonresident broker's or salesperson's
license shall be subject to fingerprinting and a check of his or her criminal
history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through the Nebraska State Patrol. Each applicant shall furnish to the Nebraska
State Patrol a full set of fingerprints to enable a criminal background investigation
to be conducted. The applicant shall request that the Nebraska State Patrol
submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national
criminal history record check. The applicant shall pay the actual cost, if
any, of the fingerprinting and check of his or her criminal history record
information. The applicant shall authorize release of the national criminal
history record check to the commission. The criminal history record information
check shall be completed within ninety days preceding the date the original
application for a license is received in the commission's office, and if not,
the application shall be returned to the applicant.

(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude the commission from entering
into reciprocal agreements with other regulatory jurisdictions when such agreements
are necessary to provide Nebraska residents authority to secure licenses in
other regulatory jurisdictions.

(6) Nonresident licenses granted as provided in this section shall remain
in force for only as long as the requirements of issuing and maintaining a
license are met unless (a) suspended or revoked by the commission for just
cause or (b) lapsed for failure to pay the annual renewal fee.

(7) Prior to the issuance of any license to a nonresident applicant,
an affidavit shall be filed by the applicant with the commission certifying
that the applicant has reviewed and is familiar with the Nebraska Real Estate
License Act and the rules and regulations of the commission and agrees to
be bound by the act, rules, and regulations. Within ninety days after the
issuance of a license to a nonresident licensee prior to July 18, 2008, the
licensee shall provide to the commission adequate proof of completion of a
three-hour class approved by the commission specific to the Nebraska Real
Estate License Act and the law of agency relationships enumerated in sections
76-2401 to 76-2430. If the licensee fails to provide adequate proof of completion
of the approved class to the commission within the ninety-day period, the
director of the commission or his or her designee shall place the license
on inactive status and notify the licensee that he or she must show cause
why the license should not be revoked.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 17;

Laws 1980, LB 936, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 15;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 95;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 60, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 819, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB715, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB25, § 16.